Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CANBY INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT; REFUNDABLE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of the following projects in the elementary and high schools in Independent School District No. 891, Canby, are exempt from sales and use tax imposed under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, if materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after December 31, 2023, and before January 1, 2026: new text end new text begin (1) a new gymnasium with improved community access; new text end new text begin (2) career technical education space addition; new text end new text begin (3) HVAC upgrades; new text end new text begin (4) a new eight-lane track; new text end new text begin (5) athletic field improvements and upgrades; new text end new text begin (6) stadium seating and press box renovations; new text end new text begin (7) secure entrance upgrades for both schools with associated administrative office relocations; new text end new text begin (8) renovations to existing locker rooms; new text end new text begin (9) classroom renovations; new text end new text begin (10) site drainage; and new text end new text begin (11) other associated renovations. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivision 1, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after December 31, 2023, and before January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin TRACY AREA INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT; REFUNDABLE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of Tracy Elementary, Tracy High School, and Tracy Kids World in Independent School District No. 2904, Tracy, are exempt from sales and use tax imposed under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, if materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after December 31, 2022, and before January 1, 2025. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivision 1, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after December 31, 2022, and before January 1, 2025. new text end